Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
AMENDMENT OF ARTICLES
OF INCORPORATION

7-130-101. Authority to amend articles of incorporation.

A nonprofit corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation or to delete a provision not required in the articles of incorporation. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

A member does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, including any provision relating to management, control, purpose, or duration of the nonprofit corporation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 706, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 625, § 32, effective July 1.

7-130-102. Amendment of articles of incorporation by board of directors or incorporators.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the board of directors may adopt, without member approval, one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation to:

Delete the statement of the names and addresses of the incorporators or of the initial directors;

Delete the statement of the registered agent name and registered agent address of the initial registered agent, if a statement of change changing the registered agent name and registered agent address of the registered agent is on file in the records of the secretary of state;

Delete the statement of the principal office address of the initial principal office, if a statement of change changing the principal office address is on file in the records of the secretary of state;

Delete the statement of the names and addresses of any or all of the individuals named in the articles of incorporation, pursuant to section 7-90-301 (6), as being individuals who caused the articles of incorporation to be delivered for filing;

Extend the duration of the nonprofit corporation if it was incorporated at a time when limited duration was required by law;

Change the domestic entity name by substituting the word "corporation", "incorporated", "company", or "limited", or an abbreviation of any such word for a similar word or abbreviation in the name, or by adding, deleting, or changing a geographical attribution; or

Make any other change expressly permitted by articles 121 to 137 of this title to be made without member action.

The board of directors may adopt, without member action, one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation to change the entity name, if necessary, in connection with the reinstatement of a nonprofit corporation pursuant to part 10 of article 90 of this title.

If a nonprofit corporation has no members or no members entitled to vote on amendments or no members yet admitted to membership, its incorporators, until directors have been chosen, and thereafter its board of directors, may adopt one or more amendments to the nonprofit corporation's articles of incorporation subject to any approval required pursuant to section 7-130-301. The nonprofit corporation shall provide notice of any meeting at which an amendment is to be voted upon. The notice shall be in accordance with section 7-128-203. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment or state the general nature of the amendment. The amendment shall be approved by a majority of the incorporators, until directors have been chosen, and thereafter by a majority of the directors in office at the time the amendment is adopted.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 707, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 625, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(d) and (2) amended, p. 984, § 86, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), and (2) amended and (1)(b.5) added, p. 2343, § 311, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(b) amended and (1)(b.4) added, p. 1512, § 303, effective July 1.

7-130-103. Amendment of articles of incorporation by board of directors and members.

Unless articles 121 to 137 of this title, the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or the members or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (5) of this section require a different vote or voting by class, the board of directors or the members representing at least ten percent of all of the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment may propose an amendment to the articles of incorporation for submission to the members.

For an amendment to the articles of incorporation to be adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:

The board of directors shall recommend the amendment to the members unless the amendment is proposed by members or unless the board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the members with the amendment; and

The members entitled to vote on the amendment shall approve the amendment as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

The proposing board of directors or the proposing members may condition the effectiveness of the amendment on any basis.

The nonprofit corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-127-104, to each member entitled to vote on the amendment of the members' meeting at which the amendment will be voted upon. The notice of the meeting shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the amendment, and the notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or a summary of the amendment or shall state the general nature of the amendment.

Unless articles 121 to 137 of this title, the articles of incorporation, bylaws adopted by the members, or the proposing board of directors or the proposing members acting pursuant to subsection (3) of this section require a greater vote, the amendment shall be approved by the votes required by sections 7-127-205 and 7-127-206 by every voting group entitled to vote on the amendment.

If the board of directors or the members seek to have the amendment approved by the members by written consent, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 708, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 625, § 34, effective July 1.

7-130-104. Voting on amendments of articles of incorporation by voting groups.

Unless otherwise provided by articles 121 to 137 of this title or the articles of incorporation, if membership voting is otherwise required by articles 121 to 137 of this title, the members of a class who are entitled to vote are entitled to vote as a separate voting group on an amendment to the articles of incorporation if the amendment would:

Affect the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption, or transfer of memberships in a manner different than such amendment would affect another class;

Change the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption, or transfer by changing the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions, or conditions of another class;

Increase or decrease the number of memberships authorized for that class;

Increase the number of memberships authorized for another class;

Effect an exchange, reclassification, or termination of the memberships of that class; or

Authorize a new class of memberships.

If a class is to be divided into two or more classes as a result of an amendment to the articles of incorporation, the amendment shall be approved by the members of each class that would be created by the amendment.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 708, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-130-105. Articles of amendment to articles of incorporation.

A nonprofit corporation amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment stating:

The domestic entity name of the nonprofit corporation; and

The text of each amendment adopted.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 1217, § 24, effective October 1, 2005.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 709, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1855, § 141, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, p. 1720, § 143, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, p. 2344, § 312, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1217, § 24, effective October 1.

7-130-106. Restated articles of incorporation.

The board of directors may restate the articles of incorporation at any time with or without member action. If the nonprofit corporation has no members and no directors have been elected, its incorporators may restate the articles of incorporation at any time.

The restatement may include one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring member approval, it shall be adopted as provided in section 7-130-103.

If the board of directors submits a restatement for member action, the nonprofit corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-127-104, to each member entitled to vote on the restatement of the members' meeting at which the restatement will be voted upon. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the restatement, and the notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the articles of incorporation.

A nonprofit corporation restating its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of restatement stating:

The domestic entity name of the nonprofit corporation;

The text of the restated articles of incorporation; and

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1879, § 8, effective August 5, 2008.)

If the restatement was adopted by the board of directors or incorporators without member action, a statement to that effect and that member action was not required.

Upon filing by the secretary of state or at any later effective date determined pursuant to section 7-90-304, restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all prior amendments to them.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 710, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

IP(4) and (5) amended, p. 1856, § 142, effective July 1; IP(4) and (5) amended, p. 1721, § 144, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(4) and (4)(a) amended, p. 2344, § 313, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2008:

(4)(b) and (4)(c) amended, p. 1879, § 8, effective August 5.

7-130-107. Amendment of articles of incorporation pursuant to reorganization.

Articles of incorporation may be amended, without action by the board of directors or members, to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under a statute of this state or of the United States if the articles of incorporation after amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by section 7-122-102.

For an amendment to the articles of incorporation to be made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, an individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment stating:

The domestic entity name of the nonprofit corporation;

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

The date of the court's order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under a specified statute of this state or of the United States.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 710, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

IP(2) amended, p. 1856, § 143, effective July 1; IP(2) amended, p. 1721, § 145, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(2) and (2)(a) amended, p. 2344, § 314, effective July 1, 2004.

7-130-108. Effect of amendment of articles of incorporation.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation does not affect any existing right of persons other than members, any cause of action existing against or in favor of the nonprofit corporation, or any proceeding to which the nonprofit corporation is a party. An amendment changing a nonprofit corporation's domestic entity name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against a nonprofit corporation in its former entity name.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 711, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 984, § 87, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2344, § 315, effective July 1, 2004.